Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2474.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6170YH (1) 91 ss/ns H.F. 2474 Section 1. Section 11.5A, Code 2026, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 11.5A Audit or examination ââ costs. 3 When requested by the auditor of state, the department 4 of management shall transfer from any unappropriated funds 5 in the state treasury an amount not exceeding the expenses 6 and prorated salary costs already paid to perform audits or 7 examinations of state departments and agencies, the offices 8 of the judicial branch, and federal financial assistance as 9 defined in the federal Single Audit Act, 31 U.S.C. Â§7501, et 10 seq., received by all other departments , as listed in section 11 11.5B , for which payments by agencies have not been made. Upon 12 payment by the departments, the auditor of state shall credit 13 the payments to the state treasury. 14 Sec. 2. Section 11.5B, Code 2026, is amended to read as 15 follows: 16 11.5B Repayment of audit expenses by state departments and 17 agencies. 18 The auditor of state shall be reimbursed by a state 19 department or agency for performing all audits or examinations 20 of the following state departments or agencies department or 21 agency , or funds received by a the department or agency : . 22 1. Department of insurance and financial services. 23 2. Department of health and human services. 24 3. State department of transportation. 25 4. State board of regents. 26 5. Department of agriculture and land stewardship. 27 6. Department of veterans affairs. 28 7. Department of education. 29 8. Department of workforce development. 30 9. Department of natural resources. 31 10. Offices of the clerks of the district court of the 32 judicial branch. 33 11. The Iowa public employeesâ retirement system. 34 12. Federal financial assistance, as defined in the federal 35 -1- LSB 6170YH (1) 91 ss/ns 1/ 2 H.F. 2474 Single Audit Act , 31 U.S.C. Â§7501, et seq. , received by all 1 other departments. 2 13. Department of administrative services. 3 Sec. 3. Section 11.5C, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 4 to read as follows: 5 2. If the state department that is the subject of the review 6 is listed in section 11.5B , the The state department shall 7 reimburse the auditor of state for the cost of the review and 8 any subsequent assistance provided by the auditor of state. 9 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 11.5D Billing rates. 10 The auditor of state shall annually adopt rules pursuant 11 to chapter 17A to establish the hourly billing rate at which 12 audit services are performed by state auditors as described in 13 section 11.31. 14